California, session 20252026, AB2013.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Part 2.25 (commencing with Section 10555) is added to Division 6 of the Water Code, to read:PART 2.25. Emergency Preparedness Planning10555. (a) For purposes of this part, “plan” means an emergency preparedness plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b). the following definitions apply:(1) “Annex” means the annex required by subdivision (b).(2) “Community water system” has the same meaning as in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) “High or very high fire risk area” means a high or very high fire hazard severity zone as designated by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code.(b) A water supplier community water system that services more than 100 customers that are located in a moderate, high, or very high fire hazard severity zone as designated by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or a local agency pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code, shall establish an emergency preparedness plan for response to red flag warnings, extreme weather events, and other major power outages or emergencies that pose a potential threat to providing adequate water service to the moderate, high, or very high fire hazard severity zone. high or very high fire risk area shall include an annex to its disaster preparedness plans with information regarding system preparedness and resiliency during a wildfire, including any applicable emergency response plan required by Section 1433(b) of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300i-2).(c) A water supplier community water system is encouraged to develop a plan the annex in coordination with the county board of supervisors, or a county agency or department if one is designated an authority to coordinate with the water supplier by the county board of supervisors. any local office of emergency services and fire department with jurisdiction in the area served by the community water system.(d) A plan The annex shall be submitted to the county board of supervisors or a county agency or department designated by the county board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (c). supervisors.(e) (1) A water supplier Beginning January 1, 2028, a community water system shall review the plan annex at least once every three years and shall update the plan annex as necessary.(2) Updates to the plan annex shall be submitted to the county board of supervisors or a county agency or department designated by the county board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (c). supervisors.10556. (a) The plan annex shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(a)(1)(1) (A) An assessment of the minimum water tank levels necessary to maintain water service for customers while providing an adequate water supply for fire fighting activities during an extreme weather event or red flag warning. average daily system capacity during a fire.(2)(B) The assessment shall take into consideration water quality standards and actions necessary to maintain water quality.(b)(1)(2) (A) An assessment that identifies the minimum number of and type of water pumps that are necessary to maintain water service for customers while providing an adequate water supply for fire fighting activities. average daily capacity, including, but not limited to, the operation of fire hydrant systems at the rated capacity.(2)(B) The assessment shall identify the number of water pumps servicing the high or very high fire risk area that are equipped with emergency backup energy sources and identify the number of water pumps servicing the high or very high fire risk area that require the installation of do not have emergency backup energy sources. sources or other redundancy measures to maintain average daily capacity.(c)(3) An identification of alternative water sources that can be used during an extreme weather event or loss of power, if any. assessment of system resiliency in the event of a loss of power, including, but not limited to, an accounting of backup energy generation, alternative water sources, or any other method that maintains average daily capacity.(d)A detailed accounting of the pipelines, water pumps, water tanks, backup power generation facilities, and related infrastructure needs that are necessary to maintain water service for customers and provide adequate water supply for fire fighting activities during an extreme weather event and a designation for which of these pipelines, water pumps, water tanks, and backup power generation facilities are, or are required to be, fire hardened.(4) (A) An assessment of the fire risk status and fire hardening measures for each water pump, any backup electrical generation equipment, applicable pipelines, and any other infrastructure elements that the community water system deems to be a critical point of failure, located in a high or very high fire risk area.(B) This section does not change the confidentiality level for any information provided pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) No information provided in the annex shall enlarge or diminish any existing liability, nor demonstrate, on its own, a substantial cause of any damages resulting from a wildfire.10557. A water supplier or community water system that is required to prepare and submit an emergency response plan to the Public Utilities Commission shall include the emergency preparedness plan annex required by this part in that submission.